Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 3

Certificate of Authority

48-246-301. Application for certificate of authority.

Before doing business in this state, a foreign LLC shall obtain a certificate of authority. An applicant for the certificate shall file with the office of the secretary of state an original copy of the application executed by the foreign LLC and setting forth:

The name of the foreign LLC;

The jurisdiction and date of its organization;

The street address, including zip code, of its registered office in this state and the name of its registered agent at that office;

The street address, including zip code, of the office required to be maintained in the jurisdiction of its organization by the laws of that jurisdiction or, if not so required, of the principal executive office of the foreign LLC or its equivalent; and

The number of members of the LLC at the date of filing the application for the certificate of authority.

The foreign LLC shall deliver with the completed application a certificate of existence (or document of similar import) duly authenticated by the secretary of state or other official having custody of LLC records in the jurisdiction of its organization. The certificate shall not bear a date of more than two (2) months prior to the date the application is filed in this state.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-246-302. Certificate of authority.

If a document delivered to the office of the secretary of state conforms to the requirement of § 48-246-301(a) and all fees have been paid, the secretary of state shall:

Endorse on the application the word “Filed” and the date and time of the filing of it;

File the original of the application; and

Return the original of the application, together with the filing fee receipt, to the person who filed it and such document shall constitute a certificate of authority issued by the secretary of state.

The certificate of authority is effective from the date the application is filed with the secretary of state, as evidenced by the secretary of state's date and time endorsement on the original document, accompanied by the payment of the requisite fee.

If the secretary of state determines upon application that a foreign LLC has been transacting business in this state without a certificate of authority for a period of one (1) year or more, then the secretary of state shall not file the application until the foreign corporation submits a confirmation of good standing relative to such foreign LLC.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 2010, ch. 741, § 31.

48-246-303. Amendments to the certificate of authority.

If any statement in the application for a certificate of authority by a foreign LLC was false when made or any matter described in the application has changed, making the application inaccurate in any respect, the foreign LLC shall promptly file with the secretary of state an application for amendment to the certificate of authority, executed by an authorized person correcting the statement; provided, that changes in the registered office or registered agent shall be made in accordance with § 48-246-301. The application for amendment to the certificate of authority shall be processed in the same manner as provided in § 48-246-302 for a certificate of authority.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.